Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6739
Prohibited act; exceptions.

On and after July 1, 1999, no person, facility, or school shall use or employ any individual to provide medications to a recipient unless the individual is a medication aide registered under the Medication Aide Act or is otherwise authorized to administer or provide medication, except that a child care facility may use or employ an individual licensed to operate a child care facility or a staff member of a child care facility or a school may use or employ a staff member of a school determined to be competent under the act. On and after July 1, 1999, no individual shall provide medication to a recipient unless the individual is a medication aide registered under the act or is otherwise authorized to administer or provide medication. Nothing in the act shall be construed to require any school to employ or use a school nurse or medication aide in order to be in compliance with the act.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 29.